Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.460

Receiving verdict and discharging jury.

If the court determines that the verdict meets the requirements contained in this chapter and in court rules, the clerk shall file the verdict. The verdict is then complete and the jury shall be discharged from the case. The verdict shall be in writing, and under the direction of the court shall be substantially entered in the record as of the day's proceedings on which it was given.

[ 2003 c 406 s 26; Code 1881 s 239; 1877 p 49 s 243; 1869 p 59 s 243; RRS s 361.]